Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 5. Deceptive Advertising of Civil Defense Aids.

Sec. 45.50.600.
Power and duty of director of civil defense.

The state director of civil defense

may adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) defining fair standards in the advertising and sale of civil defense aids; and

shall prohibit unfair or deceptive practices.

History.

(§ 2 ch 144 SLA 1962)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

45.80.010

.
Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 45.50.601.
Content of regulations.

Regulations adopted by the state director of civil defense must prohibit the following practices:

exaggerated or misleading claims of protection afforded by shelters;

the use of misleading pictures;

the use of deceptive pricing practices;

the use of guarantees in such a manner as to constitute a misrepresentation;

representations of endorsement by a governmental agency; and

any unfair or deceptive practice.

History.

(§ 3 ch 144 SLA 1962)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 45.80.020.
Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 45.50.602.
Content of installment or credit purchase plans.

Installment or credit purchase plans for civil defense aids must include a clear statement of financial terms, including a statement of annual simple interest.

History.

(§ 4 ch 144 SLA 1962)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 45.80.030.
Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 45.50.603.
Prosecution by attorney general.

The attorney general shall prosecute any legal action on behalf of the state director of civil defense.

History.

(§ 6 ch 144 SLA 1962)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 45.80.040.
Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 45.50.604.
Criminal and civil penalties.

A person who violates a provision of AS

45.50.600

—

45.50.606

or a regulation adopted by the state director of civil defense under AS

45.50.600

—

45.50.606

is punishable by a fine of not more than $500, or by imprisonment for not more than six months, or, in the alternative, is subject to a civil penalty not more than $5,000.

History.

(§ 5 ch 144 SLA 1962)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 45.80.050.
Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 45.50.606.
Definition of “civil defense aid”.

In AS

45.50.600

—

45.50.606

“civil defense aid” means a product, service, structure, or improvement intended for use by civilians as a protection against a result of an attack by a foreign power on the United States and includes but is not limited to a protective shelter or improvement.

History.

(§ 1 ch 144 SLA 1962)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 45.80.060.
Renumbered in 1980.